Missouri, session 2026, SB924.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.713, to read as
follows:
191.713. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Compassionate Assistance for Rape Emergencies
(CARE) Act".
2. As used in this section, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Emergency care to sexual assault victims",
medical examinations, procedures, or services provided at a
hospital or health care facility to a sexual assault victim
following an alleged sexual assault;
(2) "Emergency contraception", any drug or device
approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration that
prevents pregnancy after sexual intercourse;
(3) "Health care facility", any urgent care center or
facility that offers treatment for patients during normal-
business, after-business, or weekend hours and that is
affiliated with a licensed hospital;

SB 924 2
(4) "Sexual assault", includes rape in the first
degree, as described in section 566.030; rape in the second
degree, as described in section 566.031; statutory rape in
the first degree and attempt to commit statutory rape in the
first degree, as described in section 566.032; statutory
rape in the second degree, as described in section 566.034;
sodomy in the first degree, as described in section 566.060;
sodomy in the second degree, as described in section
566.061; statutory sodomy in the first degree and attempt to
commit statutory sodomy in the first degree, as described in
section 566.062; and statutory sodomy in the second degree,
as described in section 566.064;
(5) "Sexual assault victim", a person who is alleged
to have been sexually assaulted and is presented as a
patient.
3. It shall be the standard of care for any hospital
or any health care facility that provides emergency care to
sexual assault victims to:
(1) Orally inform each sexual assault victim of the
option to be provided emergency contraception at the
hospital or health care facility;
(2) Provide the complete regimen of emergency
contraception immediately at the hospital or health care
facility to each sexual assault victim who requests it; and
(3) Provide sexually transmitted infection screening
and treatment to the sexual assault victim.
4. The department of health and senior services shall
promulgate all rules and regulations to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of

SB 924 3
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓